Maine, session 132, LD325.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 12 MRSA §6131, sub-§8, as amended by PL 2011, c. 598, §11, is further
amended to read:
8. Migratory Fish Fund. All fees received by the commissioner from river herring
leasing rights are allocated to the Migratory Fish Fund, as established. Expenditures from
the Migratory Fish Fund must be made:
A. To build fishways for river herring and other migratory fish;
B. For construction of other facilities for improving the environment of river herring
and other migratory fish;
C. For general propagation and conservation of river herring and other migratory fish;
D. For research to enhance the fishing industry based on river herring and other
migratory fish; and
E. For management measures required to maintain or enhance river herring
populations or populations of other migratory fish.; and
F. To municipalities where river herring harvesting rights have been granted and to
municipalities where known migration of river herring has occurred. Recipient
municipalities may donate funds for the purpose of supporting programs designed to
restore or protect the quality of the environment of river herring.
The Migratory Fish Fund does not lapse.
Sec. 2. Study; equitable distribution of funds from Migratory Fish Fund.
The Department of Marine Resources shall study how to equitably distribute funds from
the Migratory Fish Fund, under the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 12, section 631,
subsection 8, to municipalities. By December 3, 2025, the department shall report its
findings, including any suggested legislation, to the Joint Standing Committee on Marine
Resources. The committee may report out a bill based on the report to the Second Regular
Session of the 132nd Legislature.